Missouri, session 2026, SB1100.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 442.700, to read as
follows:
442.700. 1. For purposes of this section, the term
"corporation" means any corporation or other business entity
that has fifty million dollars or more in net value or
assets under management on any day during any taxable year.
2. Beginning August 28, 2026, a corporation or any
affiliate or subsidiary thereof shall not acquire, directly
or indirectly, any residential real estate in this state.
The attorney general may bring a cause of action in any
circuit court with proper jurisdiction if the attorney
general has reason to believe that a corporation or any
affiliate or subsidiary thereof has acquired, directly or
indirectly, any residential real estate in this state on or
after August 28, 2026. If the court finds that residential
real estate has been acquired in violation of this act, the
court shall order the sale of the residential real estate
not later than ninety days after the order.

SB 1100 2
3. This section does not prohibit a bank or other
financial institution from offering or issuing a mortgage
for the purpose of acquiring residential real estate.
✓